District of Columbia statutes.
8-241.09

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, including civil penalties or fines to enforce this chapter.

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 310, 61 DCR 6767